Utah statutes.
16-10a-1511.   Service on foreign corporation.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the division may serve a foreign corporation by first-class, postage prepaid United States mail.

(2)  The registered agent of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state is the foreign corporation's agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign corporation.

(3) (a)  If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state has no registered agent or if the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the foreign corporation may be served by mail that is:

(i)  registered or certified;

(ii)  return receipt requested; and

(iii)  addressed to the foreign corporation at its principal office.

(b)  Service is perfected under this Subsection (3) at the earliest of:

(i)  the date the foreign corporation receives the process, notice, or demand;

(ii)  the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the foreign corporation; or

(iii)  five days after mailing.

(4)  This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

